Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 15
PRIMARY ELECTIONS

1-15-101 to 1-15-110. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article repealed, p. 418, § 38, effective January 1, 1981.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 8 of chapter 49, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1980, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.